New York, session 2025-2026, S3549.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1800 of the vehicle and traffic law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision (e-1) to read as follows: 3 (e-1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivisions (b) and (c) of 4 this section, every person convicted of a violation of the provisions of 5 section eleven hundred forty-four-a of this chapter shall for a first 6 conviction thereof be punished by a fine of not more than four hundred 7 fifty dollars. For a conviction of a second violation, both of which 8 were committed within a period of eighteen months, such person shall be 9 punished by a fine of not more than six hundred dollars and shall be 10 assessed six points to such person's driving record, which shall also 11 cause such person to be liable to the department for payment of a driver 12 responsibility assessment as provided in subdivision four of section 13 five hundred three of this chapter. For a conviction of a third 14 violation and all subsequent violations, all of which were committed 15 within a period of eighteen months, such person shall be punished by a 16 fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars or by imprisonment for 17 not more than one year or by both such fine and imprisonment. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08099-01-5